Washington statutes.
RCW 31.24.170

Business development companies designated state development companies.

Any business development company organized under this chapter shall be a state development company, as authorized under Title V of the small business investment act of 1958, Public Law 85-699, 15 U.S.C. Sec. 695, as amended, or any other similar federal legislation.

[ 2006 c 87 s 19; 1963 c 162 s 17.]